Mississippi, session 2026, HB650.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-153-235, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-153-235.  (1)  There is established the Paramedics Recruitment and Retention Scholarship Program ("the program").  The scholarship program shall be used by the Office of Workforce Development, with the Mississippi Department of Employment Security acting as the fiscal agent, for the purpose of providing funding for grants to cover the full cost of tuition, fees, books and any required uniforms for qualified applicants to attend an accredited paramedic program and to reimburse the cost of a qualified applicant's fee for the successful completion of the National Registry Paramedic cognitive and psychomotor examinations.  The scholarship program shall be funded from monies appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose. (2)  For the purposes of this article, a "paramedic" means a certified healthcare professional who specializes in providing emergency medical treatment to people who are injured or ill, typically in a setting outside of a hospital. (3)  The Office of Workforce Development shall prescribe the terms and conditions of grants awarded under the program.  To qualify for a grant under this program, an applicant must: (a)  Be a certified Emergency Medical Technician (EMT); (b)  Have the necessary requisites for an accredited paramedic program; (c)  Commit to locate in the State of Mississippi for a minimum of three (3) years; and (d)  Meet any other conditions for receipt as prescribed by the Office of Workforce Development. (4)  The Office of Workforce Development may use a maximum of five percent (5%) of funds appropriated for the program for the administration of the program. (5)  The Office of Workforce Development may promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section. SECTION 2.  Section 37-153-237, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-153-237.  The office shall enter into a grant contract  agreement with each recipient of a grant under the program that incorporates * * *the following obligations and conditions * * *: as determined appropriate by the office. * * * (a)  The recipient of a grant shall commit to serving as a paramedic for three (3) continuous years in the State of Mississippi; (b) If any recipient of a grant under the program does not engage in serving as a paramedic in accordance with the terms of this article, the recipient shall be obligated to repay the grant amounts received, together with interest thereon at the maximum rate allowed by Mississippi law or the federal discount rate plus five percent (5%) per year, whichever is less, the interest to accrue from the date that each payment of funds was received by the recipient; (c) No interest shall accrue and there shall be no obligation to repay the principal sums accrued during any one (1) period of time that the recipient involuntarily serves on active duty in the United States Armed Forces; and (d) Repayment of the principal with interest shall be due and payable in full immediately on the occurrence of either of the following events: (i) Failure to remain in the State of Mississippi for three (3) continuous years for any reason other than temporary personal illness; or (ii) Failure to serve as a paramedic on a regularly sustained basis as provided in the eligibility requirements of Section 37‑153‑235. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.